Utah statutes.
17-27a-702.   Variances.

(1)  Any person or entity desiring a waiver or modification of the requirements of a land use ordinance as applied to a parcel of property that he owns, leases, or in which he holds some other beneficial interest may apply to the applicable appeal authority for a variance from the terms of the ordinance.

(2) (a)  The appeal authority may grant a variance only if:

(i)  literal enforcement of the ordinance would cause an unreasonable hardship for the applicant that is not necessary to carry out the general purpose of the land use ordinances;

(ii)  there are special circumstances attached to the property that do not generally apply to other properties in the same zone;

(iii)  granting the variance is essential to the enjoyment of a substantial property right possessed by other property in the same zone;

(iv)  the variance will not substantially affect the general plan and will not be contrary to the public interest; and

(v)  the spirit of the land use ordinance is observed and substantial justice done.

(b) (i)  In determining whether or not enforcement of the land use ordinance would cause unreasonable hardship under Subsection (2)(a), the appeal authority may not find an unreasonable hardship unless the alleged hardship:

(A)  is located on or associated with the property for which the variance is sought; and

(B)  comes from circumstances peculiar to the property, not from conditions that are general to the neighborhood.

(ii)  In determining whether or not enforcement of the land use ordinance would cause unreasonable hardship under Subsection (2)(a), the appeal authority may not find an unreasonable hardship if the hardship is self-imposed or economic.

(c)  In determining whether or not there are special circumstances attached to the property under Subsection (2)(a), the appeal authority may find that special circumstances exist only if the special circumstances:

(i)  relate to the hardship complained of; and

(ii)  deprive the property of privileges granted to other properties in the same zone.

(3)  The applicant shall bear the burden of proving that all of the conditions justifying a variance have been met.

(4)  Variances run with the land.

(5)  The appeal authority may not grant a use variance.

(6)  In granting a variance, the appeal authority may impose additional requirements on the applicant that will:

(a)  mitigate any harmful affects of the variance; or

(b)  serve the purpose of the standard or requirement that is waived or modified.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

